Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 55.1-1200.
(Contingent effective date /- See Editor's note) Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Action”
means any recoupment, counterclaim, setoff, or other civil action and any other proceeding in which rights are determined, including actions for possession, rent, unlawful detainer, unlawful entry, and distress for rent.

“Application deposit”
means any refundable deposit of money, however denominated, including all money intended to be used as a security deposit under a rental agreement, or property, that is paid by a tenant to a landlord for the purpose of being considered as a tenant for a dwelling unit.

“Application fee”
means any nonrefundable fee that is paid by a tenant to a landlord or managing agent for the purpose of being considered as a tenant for a dwelling unit.

“Assignment”
means the transfer by any tenant of all interests created by a rental agreement.

“Authorized occupant”
means a person entitled to occupy a dwelling unit with the consent of the landlord, but who has not signed the rental agreement and therefore does not have the financial obligations as a tenant under the rental agreement.

“Building or housing code”
means any law, ordinance, or governmental regulation concerning fitness for habitation or the construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use, or appearance of any structure or that part of a structure that is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person who maintains a household or by two or more persons who maintain a common household.

“Commencement date of rental agreement”
means the date upon which the tenant is entitled to occupy the dwelling unit as a tenant.

“Community land trust”
means a community housing development organization whose (i) corporate membership is open to any adult resident or organization of a particular geographic area specified in the bylaws of the organization and (ii) board of directors includes a majority of members who are elected by the corporate membership and are composed of tenants, corporate members who are not tenants, and any other category of persons specified in the bylaws of the organization and that:

Is not sponsored by a for-profit organization;

Acquires parcels of land, held in perpetuity, primarily for conveyance under long-term ground leases;

Transfers ownership of any structural improvements located on such leased parcels to the tenant; and

Retains a preemptive option to purchase any such structural improvement at a price determined by formula that is designed to ensure that the improvement remains affordable to low-income and moderate-income families in perpetuity.“Damage insurance” means a bond or commercial insurance coverage as specified in the rental agreement to secure the performance by the tenant of the terms and conditions of the rental agreement and to replace all or part of a security deposit.“Dwelling unit” means a structure or part of a structure that is used as a home or residence by one or more persons who maintain a household, including a manufactured home, as defined in §

55.1-1300

.“Effective date of rental agreement” means the date on which the rental agreement is signed by the landlord and the tenant obligating each party to the terms and conditions of the rental agreement.“Essential service” includes heat, running water, hot water, electricity, and gas.“Facility” means something that is built, constructed, installed, or established to perform some particular function.“Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the transaction concerned.“Guest or invitee” means a person, other than the tenant or an authorized occupant, who has the permission of the tenant to visit but not to occupy the premises.“Interior of the dwelling unit” means the inside of the dwelling unit, consisting of interior walls, floor, and ceiling, that enclose the dwelling unit as conditioned space from the outside air.“Landlord” means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the dwelling unit or the building of which such dwelling unit is a part. “Landlord” also includes a managing agent of the premises who fails to disclose the name of such owner, lessor, or sublessor. Such managing agent shall be subject to the provisions of § 16.1-88.03. “Landlord” does not include a community land trust.“Managing agent” means the person authorized by the landlord to act as the property manager on behalf of the landlord pursuant to the written property management agreement.“Mold remediation in accordance with professional standards” means mold remediation of that portion of the dwelling unit or premises affected by mold, or any personal property of the tenant affected by mold, performed consistent with guidance documents published by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, or the American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists (Bioaerosols: Assessment and Control); Standard and Reference Guides of the Institute of Inspection, Cleaning and Restoration Certification (IICRC) for Professional Water Damage Restoration and Professional Mold Remediation; or any protocol for mold remediation prepared by an industrial hygienist consistent with such guidance documents.“Multifamily dwelling unit” means more than one single-family dwelling unit located in a building. However, nothing in this definition shall be construed to apply to any nonresidential space in such building.“Natural person,” wherever the chapter refers to an owner as a “natural person,” includes co-owners who are natural persons, either as tenants in common, joint tenants, tenants in partnership, tenants by the entirety, trustees or beneficiaries of a trust, general partnerships, limited liability partnerships, registered limited liability partnerships or limited liability companies, or any other lawful combination of natural persons permitted by law.“Notice” means notice given in writing by either regular mail or hand delivery, with the sender retaining sufficient proof of having given such notice in the form of a certificate of service confirming such mailing prepared by the sender. However, a person shall be deemed to have notice of a fact if he has actual knowledge of it, he has received a verbal notice of it, or, from all of the facts and circumstances known to him at the time in question, he has reason to know it exists. A person “notifies” or “gives” a notice or notification to another by taking steps reasonably calculated to inform another person, whether or not the other person actually comes to know of it. If notice is given that is not in writing, the person giving the notice has the burden of proof to show that the notice was given to the recipient of the notice.“Organization” means a corporation, government, governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, or association; two or more persons having a joint or common interest; any combination thereof; and any other legal or commercial entity.“Owner” means one or more persons or entities, jointly or severally, including a mortgagee in possession, in whom is vested:

1.

All or part of the legal title to the property; or

2.

All or part of the beneficial ownership and a right to present use and enjoyment of the premises.
“Person”
means any individual, group of individuals, corporation, partnership, business trust, association, or other legal entity, or any combination thereof.

“Premises”

means a dwelling unit and the structure of which it is a part, facilities and appurtenances contained therein, and grounds, areas, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally or whose use is promised to the tenant.

“Processing fee for payment of rent with bad check”

means the processing fee specified in the rental agreement, not to exceed $50, assessed by a landlord against a tenant for payment of rent with a check drawn by the tenant on which payment has been refused by the payor bank because the drawer had no account or insufficient funds.

“Readily accessible”

means areas within the interior of the dwelling unit available for observation at the time of the move-in inspection that do not require removal of materials, personal property, equipment, or similar items.

“Rent”

means all money, other than a security deposit, owed or paid to the landlord under the rental agreement, including prepaid rent paid more than one month in advance of the rent due date.

“Rental agreement”

or

“lease agreement”

means all rental agreements, written or oral, and valid rules and regulations adopted under §

55.1-1228

embodying the terms and conditions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises.

“Rental application”

means the written application or similar document used by a landlord to determine if a prospective tenant is qualified to become a tenant of a dwelling unit.

“Renter’s insurance”

means insurance coverage specified in the rental agreement that is a combination multi-peril policy containing fire, miscellaneous property, and personal liability coverage insuring personal property located in dwelling units not occupied by the owner.

“Residential tenancy”

means a tenancy that is based on a rental agreement between a landlord and a tenant for a dwelling unit.

“Roomer”

means a person occupying a dwelling unit that lacks a major bathroom or kitchen facility, in a structure where one or more major facilities are used in common by occupants of the dwelling unit and other dwelling units. “Major facility” in the case of a bathroom means a toilet and either a bath or shower and in the case of a kitchen means a refrigerator, stove, or sink.

“Security deposit”

means any refundable deposit of money that is furnished by a tenant to a landlord to secure the performance of the terms and conditions of a rental agreement, as a security for damages to the leased premises, or as a pet deposit. However, such money shall be deemed an application deposit until the commencement date of the rental agreement. “Security deposit” does not include a damage insurance policy or renter’s insurance policy, as those terms are defined in §

55.1-1206

, purchased by a landlord to provide coverage for a tenant.

“Single-family residence”

means a structure, other than a multifamily residential structure, maintained and used as a single dwelling unit, condominium unit, or any other dwelling unit that has direct access to a street or thoroughfare and does not share heating facilities, hot water equipment, or any other essential facility or essential service with any other dwelling unit.

“Sublease”

means the transfer by any tenant of any but not all interests created by a rental agreement.

“Tenant”

means a person entitled only under the terms of a rental agreement to occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others and includes a roomer. “Tenant” does not include (i) an authorized occupant, (ii) a guest or invitee, or (iii) any person who guarantees or cosigns the payment of the financial obligations of a rental agreement but has no right to occupy a dwelling unit.

“Tenant records”

means all information, including financial, maintenance, and other records about a tenant or prospective tenant, whether such information is in written or electronic form or any other medium.

“Utility”

means electricity, natural gas, or water and sewer provided by a public service corporation or such other person providing utility services as permitted under § 56-1.2. If the rental agreement so provides, a landlord may use submetering equipment or energy allocation equipment as defined in § 56-245.2 or a ratio utility billing system as defined in §

55.1-1212

.

“Visible evidence of mold”

means the existence of mold in the dwelling unit that is visible to the naked eye by the landlord or tenant in areas within the interior of the dwelling unit readily accessible at the time of the move-in inspection.

“Written notice”

means notice given in accordance with §

55.1-1202

, including any representation of words, letters, symbols, numbers, or figures, whether (i) printed in or inscribed on a tangible medium or (ii) stored in an electronic form or any other medium, retrievable in a perceivable form, and regardless of whether an electronic signature authorized by the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.) is affixed.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.4; 1977, c. 427; 1987, c. 428; 1990, c. 55; 1991, c. 205; 1999, cc. 77, 258, 359, 390; 2000, cc. 760, 816; 2002, c. 531; 2003, cc. 355, 425, 855; 2004, c. 123; 2007, c. 634; 2008, cc. 489, 640; 2010, cc. 180, 550, § 55-221.1; 2012, c. 788; 2013, c. 563; 2014, c. 651; 2015, c. 596; 2016, c. 744; 2017, c. 730; 2019, cc. 5, 45, 477; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 427.

Cross references.

As to recovery in certain civil actions concerning checks or rejected electronic funds transfers, see §

8.01-27.1

. As to civil recovery for giving bad check, see §

8.01-27.2

. As to summons for unlawful detainer issued by magistrate or clerk or judge of a general district court, see §

8.01-126

. As to duty of landlord and managing agent with respect to visible mold, see §

8.01-226.12

.
As to time period for issuing writs of eviction in unlawful entry and detainer, see §

8.01-471

.

As to assessment of or exemption from real property tax, for certain real property conveyed or owned by a community land trust, see §

58.1-3295.2

.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala. §§ 35-9A-101 to 35-9A-603.

Alaska: Alaska Stat. §§ 34.03.010 to 34.03.380.

Arizona: A.R.S. §§ 33-1301 through 33-1381.

Florida: Fla. Stat. §§ 83.40 to 83.682.

Iowa: Iowa Code §§ 562A.1 to 562A.37.

Kansas: K.S.A. §§ 58-2540 to 58-2573.

Kentucky: K.R.S. §§ 383.500 to 383.715.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno. §§ 70-24-101 to 70-24-442.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. §§ 76-1401 to 76-1449.

Oregon: O.R.S. §§ 90.100 to 90.940.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws §§ 34-18-1 to 34-18-57.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann. §§ 27-40-10 to 27-40-940.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. §§ 66-28-101 to 66-28-521.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash. §§ 59.18.010 to 59.18.900.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 5 and 45 amended § 55-248.4, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by inserting “rental” preceding “agreements, written or oral ” in the definition of “Rental agreement.”

Acts 2019, c. 477 amended § 55-248.4 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in the definition of “Managing agent” by substituting “the person” for “a person ” and “as the property manager on behalf of the landlord pursuant to the written property management” for “on behalf of the landlord under an.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 49, cl. 1, effective November 9, 2020, provides: “§ 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any tenant as defined in §

55.1-1200

of the Code of Virginia who is a defendant in an unlawful detainer for nonpayment of rent pursuant to §

55.1-1245

of the Code of Virginia for rent due during the Emergency seeking a judgment for the payment of money or possession of the premises shall be granted a 60-day continuance of such unlawful detainer action from the initial court date if the tenant appears on such court date and provides written proof that he was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any homeowner who, during the Emergency, defaults on a note that is secured by a one-family to four-family residential property located in the Commonwealth and is subject to a foreclosure proceeding on any mortgage or to the execution of or sale under any deed of trust shall be granted a 30-day stay of such proceeding if the homeowner, within 90 days of the initial declaration of the Emergency or 90 days following the end of the Emergency, whichever is later, requests a stay and provides written proof to his lender that he was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any owner who rents a residential dwelling unit located in the Commonwealth to a tenant as defined in §

55.1-1200

of the Code of Virginia and who, during the Emergency, defaults on a note that is secured by such dwelling unit and is subject to a foreclosure proceeding on any mortgage or to the execution of or sale under any deed of trust shall be granted a 30-day stay of such proceeding if the owner, within 90 days of the initial declaration of the Emergency or 90 days following the end of the Emergency, whichever is later, requests a stay and provides written proof to his lender that his tenant was affected by the Emergency.

“§ 4. Homeowners and owners shall be excluded from the provisions of this act if they are subject to protection from foreclosure under the provisions of a federal, state, or local law, regulation, or action enacted in response to the COVID-19 pandemic or the Emergency.

“§ 5. Any continuance of a stay period provided by this act shall be tolled during the period of any judicial emergency declared pursuant to §

17.1-330

of the Code of Virginia due to the Emergency.

“§ 6. The 60-day continuance provided by this act shall run concurrently with any period of eviction protection provided by any other state or federal law.

“§ 7. For the purposes of this act:

“ ‘Affected by’ means to experience a loss of income, whether partial or complete, from a public or private source due to the Emergency, such that the affected party must request a stay or continuance, as applicable, by providing written proof to a court or lender, as applicable, stating that as a result of the Emergency he is (i) not currently receiving wages or payments or (ii) receiving reduced wages or payments from a public or private source.

“ ‘Emergency’ means the state of emergency declared by the Governor in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.

“ ‘Written proof’ means (i) a paystub showing reduced earnings for a pay period during the period of the Emergency in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, (ii) a copy of a furlough notification letter or essential employee status letter indicating the employee’s status as nonessential due to the Emergency, or (iii) any other documentation deemed appropriate by a court or lender.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 49, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire 90 days following the end of a state of emergency declared by the Governor in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, effective July 1, 2021, added definitions for “Damage insurance” and “Renter’s insurance.”

Law Review.

For note on the Uniform Landlord and Tenant Act and its effect on reform favorable to the tenant, see 15 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 845 (1974).

For article, “The Evolution of Implied Warranties in Commercial Real Estate Leases,” see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (1994).

For article “Security Deposit Disputes Under Virginia Landlord-Tenant Law: Traps For The Unwary,” see The Army Lawyer, December 1994, at 3.

For article, “Toward a Model Law of Estates and Future Interests,” see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

; 11B M.J. Landlord and Tenant, § 16.

§ 55.1-1201.
Applicability of chapter; local authority.

This chapter shall apply to all jurisdictions in the Commonwealth and may not be waived or otherwise modified, in whole or in part, by the governing body of any locality or its boards or commissions or other instrumentalities or by the courts of the Commonwealth. Occupancy in a public housing unit or other housing unit that is a dwelling unit is subject to this chapter; however, if the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the regulations of the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, such regulations shall control.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to occupancy in all single-family and multifamily dwelling units and multifamily dwelling units located in the Commonwealth.

The following tenancies and occupancies are not residential tenancies under this chapter:

Residence at a public or private institution, if incidental to detention or the provision of medical, geriatric, educational, counseling, religious, or similar services;

Occupancy by a member of a fraternal or social organization in the portion of a structure operated for the benefit of the organization;

Occupancy by an owner of a condominium unit or a holder of a proprietary lease in a cooperative;

Occupancy in a campground as defined in §

35.1-1

;

Occupancy by a tenant who pays no rent pursuant to a rental agreement;

Occupancy by an employee of a landlord whose right to occupancy in a multifamily dwelling unit is conditioned upon employment in and about the premises or a former employee whose occupancy continues less than 60 days;

Occupancy under a contract of sale of a dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, if the occupant is the purchaser or a person who succeeds to his interest; or

Occupancy in a recovery residence as defined in §

37.2-431.1

.

The following provisions apply to occupancy in a hotel, motel, extended stay facility, etc.:

A guest who is an occupant of a hotel, motel, extended stay facility, vacation residential facility, including those governed by the Virginia Real Estate Time-Share Act (§

55.1-2200

et seq.), boardinghouse, or similar transient lodging shall not be construed to be a tenant living in a dwelling unit if such person does not reside in such lodging as his primary residence. Such guest shall be exempt from this chapter, and the innkeeper or property owner, or his agent, shall have the right to use self-help eviction under Virginia law, without the necessity of the filing of an unlawful detainer action in a court of competent jurisdiction and the execution of a writ of eviction issued pursuant to such action, which would otherwise be required under this chapter.

A hotel, motel, extended stay facility, vacation residential facility, including those governed by the Virginia Real Estate Time-Share Act (§

55.1-2200

et seq.), boardinghouse, or similar transient lodging shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter if overnight sleeping accommodations are furnished to a person for consideration if such person does not reside in such lodging as his primary residence.

If a person resides in a hotel, motel, extended stay facility, vacation residential facility, including those governed by the Virginia Real Estate Time-Share Act (§ 55.1-2200 et seq.), boardinghouse, or similar transient lodging as his primary residence for 90 consecutive days or less, such lodging shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter. However, the owner of such lodging establishment shall give a five-day written notice of nonpayment to a person residing in such lodging and, upon the expiration of the five-day period specified in the notice, may exercise self-help eviction if payment in full has not been received.

If a person resides in a hotel, motel, extended stay facility, vacation residential facility, including those governed by the Virginia Real Estate Time-Share Act (§ 55.1-2200 et seq.), boardinghouse, or similar transient lodging as his primary residence for more than 90 consecutive days or is subject to a written lease for more than 90 days, such lodging shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Nothing herein shall be construed to preclude the owner of a lodging establishment that uses self-help eviction pursuant to this section from pursuing any civil or criminal remedies under the laws of the Commonwealth.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a locality from establishing a commission, reconciliatory in nature only, or designating an existing agency, which upon mutual agreement of the parties may mediate conflicts that may arise out of the application of this chapter, nor shall anything in this chapter be deemed to prohibit an ordinance designed to effect compliance with local property maintenance codes. This chapter shall supersede all other local ordinances or regulations concerning landlord and tenant relations and the leasing of residential property.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.3; 1977, c. 427; 2000, c. 760, § 55-248.3:1; 2001, c. 416; 2017, c. 730; 2018, cc. 50, 78, 221; 2019, cc. 180, 700, 712; 2022, cc. 732, 755.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 180 and 700 amended § 55-248.3:1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “writ of eviction” for “writ of possession” in subdivision D 1.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

; 11B M.J. Landlord and Tenant, § 16.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by cc. 732 and 755 are identical, and added subdivision C 8; and made stylistic changes.

§ 55.1-1202.
Notice.

If the rental agreement so provides, the landlord and tenant may send notices in electronic form; however, any tenant who so requests may elect to send and receive notices in paper form. If electronic delivery is used, the sender shall retain sufficient proof of the electronic delivery, which may be an electronic receipt of delivery, a confirmation that the notice was sent by facsimile, or a certificate of service prepared by the sender confirming the electronic delivery.

In the case of the landlord, notice is served on the landlord at his place of business where the rental agreement was made or at any place held out by the landlord as the place for receipt of the communication.In the case of the tenant, notice is served at the tenant’s last known place of residence, which may be the dwelling unit.

Notice, knowledge, or a notice or notification received by an organization is effective for a particular transaction from the time it is brought to the attention of the person conducting that transaction, or from the time it would have been brought to his attention if the organization had exercised reasonable diligence.

No notice of termination of tenancy served upon a tenant by a public housing authority organized under the Housing Authorities Law (§

36-1

et seq.) shall be effective unless it contains on its first page, in type no smaller or less legible than that otherwise used in the body of the notice, the name, address, and telephone number of the legal aid program, if any, serving the jurisdiction in which the premises is located.No notice of termination of tenancy served upon a tenant receiving tenant-based rental assistance through (i) the Housing Choice Voucher Program, 42 U.S.C. § 1437f(o), or (ii) any other federal, state, or local program by a private landlord shall be effective unless it contains on its first page, in type no smaller or less legible than that otherwise used in the body of the notice, the statewide legal aid telephone number and website address.

The landlord may, in accordance with a written agreement, delegate to a managing agent or other third party the responsibility of providing any written notice under this chapter. The landlord may also engage an attorney at law to prepare or provide any written notice under this chapter or legal process under Title 8.01. Nothing herein shall be construed to preclude use of an electronic signature as defined in § 59.1-480, or an electronic notarization as defined in §

47.1-2

, in any written notice under this chapter or legal process under Title 8.01.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.6; 1982, c. 260; 1993, c. 754; 1998, c. 260; 2000, c. 760; 2008, cc. 489, 640; 2017, c. 730; 2019, c. 712; 2020, cc. 182, 183.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 182 and 183 are identical, and in subsection D, in the first paragraph, substituted “legal aid program” for “legal services program” and added the second paragraph.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

Contact information. —

Public housing authority’s notice of termination was ineffective because it failed to comply with subsection E, which directed the housing authority to list the contact information of the local legal services program available to the tenant on the first page of all notices of termination; the language in subsection E is mandatory. Old Dominion Hous. L.P. v. Diaz, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 45 (Alexandria July 1, 2013).

§ 55.1-1203.
Application; deposit, fee, and additional information.

Any landlord may require a refundable application deposit in addition to a nonrefundable application fee. If the applicant fails to rent the unit for which application was made, from the application deposit the landlord shall refund to the applicant within 20 days after the applicant’s failure to rent the unit or the landlord’s rejection of the application all sums in excess of the landlord’s actual expenses and damages together with an itemized list of such expenses and damages. If, however, the application deposit was made by cash, certified check, cashier’s check, or postal money order, such refund shall be made within 10 days of the applicant’s failure to rent the unit if the failure to rent is due to the landlord’s rejection of the application. If the landlord fails to comply with this section, the applicant may recover as damages suffered by him that portion of the application deposit wrongfully withheld and reasonable attorney fees.

A landlord may request that a prospective tenant provide information that will enable the landlord to determine whether each applicant may become a tenant. The landlord may photocopy each applicant’s driver’s license or other similar photo identification, containing either the applicant’s social security number or control number issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

46.2-342

. However, a landlord shall not photocopy a U.S. government-issued identification so long as to do so is a violation of 18 U.S.C. § 701. The landlord may require, for the purpose of determining whether each applicant is eligible to become a tenant in the landlord’s dwelling unit, that each applicant provide a social security number issued by the U.S. Social Security Administration or an individual taxpayer identification number issued by the U.S. Internal Revenue Service.

An application fee shall not exceed $50, exclusive of any actual out-of-pocket expenses paid by the landlord to a third party performing background, credit, or other pre-occupancy checks on the applicant. However, where an application is being made for a dwelling unit that is a public housing unit or other housing unit subject to regulation by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, an application fee shall not exceed $32, exclusive of any actual out-of-pocket expenses paid to a third party by the landlord performing background, credit, or other pre-occupancy checks on the applicant.

A landlord shall consider evidence of an applicant’s status as a victim of family abuse, as defined in § 16.1-228, to mitigate any adverse effect of an otherwise qualified applicant’s low credit score. In order to establish the applicant’s status as a victim of family abuse, an applicant may submit to the landlord (i) a letter from a sexual and domestic violence program, a housing counselor certified by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, or an attorney representing the applicant; (ii) a law-enforcement incident report; or (iii) a court order. If a landlord does not comply with this section, the applicant may recover actual damages, including all amounts paid to the landlord as an application fee, application deposit, or reimbursement for any of the landlord’s out-of-pocket expenses that were charged to the prospective tenant, along with attorney fees.

History.

1977, c. 427, § 55-248.6:1; 1985, c. 208; 1993, c. 382; 2000, c. 760; 2003, c. 416; 2008, c. 489; 2011, c. 766; 2013, c. 563; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 388.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 388 added subsection D.